Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 11 Certification of Teachers
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-11-1.
Certification of public school teachers required — Deductions from state aid for noncompliance.

No person shall be employed to teach, as principal or assistant, in any school supported wholly or in part by public money unless the person shall have a certificate of qualification issued by or under the authority of the board of regents for elementary and secondary education. Provided, however, that any person who is employed as a part time speech and language pathologist at the Rhode Island School for the Deaf, for a period of not less than ten (10) years prior to July 11, 1990, shall not be required to have a certificate of qualification, and shall be exempt from the provisions of this section which require the certificate. In case any city or town shall pay or cause to be paid any of the public money to any person for teaching who did not, at the time of teaching, hold a certificate, then the department of elementary and secondary education shall deduct a sum equal to the amount so paid from the amount of the state’s money due, or which may thereafter become due, to the city or town, before giving his or her order in favor of the city or town for any of the public money under the provisions of §§

16-1-10

,

16-1-11

, and

16-5-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 544, § 9; P.L. 1903, ch. 1114, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-11-1

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 46; P.L. 1990, ch. 326, § 2.

16-11-2.
Examinations — Issuance of certificates.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall hold, or cause to be held, in any places in different parts of the state and at any times it may determine, examinations for the position of teacher in the public schools of this state; and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education is authorized to issue certificates of qualification which shall be valid throughout the state for the grade and time specified in the certificate. All assessed fees shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 544, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-11-2

; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 44.

16-11-2.1, 16-11-2.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 385, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 46; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 404, § 13, effective August 9, 1996.

16-11-2.3.
Standardized testing — Issuance of certificates.

No person who obtained an initial certificate prior to January 8, 2002 shall be barred from certification under this chapter solely because of his or her score on any standardized teacher’s examination; provided, however, that he or she successfully completes an assessment, based on criteria established by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education, in accordance with 34 CFR § 200.56.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may administer a written examination to prospective teachers seeking certification.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 165, § 1.

16-11-3.
Certificates without examination.

The board of regents for elementary and secondary education may, in its discretion, issue certificates of qualification without examination to persons who may present evidence of qualification and shall comply with the regulations of the board. Provided, that any teacher who is certified in two (2) fields or subjects of science, other than general science, shall also be automatically certified in the field or subject of general science without the need for examination or other proof of qualifications in the subject of general science.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 544, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 68, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 71, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 180, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-11-3

; P.L. 1980, ch. 379, § 1.

16-11-4.
Annulment of certificates — Annulment, renewal, or recertification of certificates.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations under which a certificate may be annulled for cause. The holder shall be entitled to notice and a hearing before the commissioner of elementary and secondary education prior to the annulment of the certificate. The holder shall have an opportunity to appeal the decision of the commissioner to the council on elementary and secondary education, if desired.

In the event the license of any person licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter is subject to renewal or recertification, for any reason, including, but not limited to, the payment of licensing fees, the department of elementary and secondary education shall send notice to such person of the need for such renewal or recertification, by electronic mail or e-mail. Said notice shall be issued at least ninety (90) calendar days prior to the proposed action. Such notice shall include:

The action proposed by the department;

The date such action proposed is to be taken; and

A statement as to what actions the person needs to perform to retain the license, if applicable.

The notice required by subsection (b) of this section shall be in addition to, and not in place of, any other notice required by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 94, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 115, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 7.

16-11-5.
Interstate agreement.

The interstate agreement on qualification of education personnel is enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 206, § 1.

INTERSTATE AGREEMENT ON
QUALIFICATION OF EDUCATIONAL PERSONNEL

ARTICLE I Purpose, Findings, and Policy

The states party to this agreement, desiring by common action to improve their respective school systems by utilizing the teacher or other professional educational person wherever educated, declare that it is the policy of each of them, on the basis of cooperation with one another, to take advantage of the preparation and experience of such persons wherever gained, thereby serving the best interests of society, of education, and of the teaching profession. It is the purpose of this agreement to provide for the development and execution of such programs of cooperation as will facilitate the movement of teachers and other professional educational personnel among the states party to it, and to authorize specific interstate educational personnel contracts to achieve that end.

The party states find that included in the large movement of population among all sections of the nation are many qualified educational personnel who move for family and other personal reasons but who are hindered in using their professional skill and experience in their new locations. Variations from state to state in requirements for qualifying educational personnel discourage such personnel from taking the steps necessary to qualify in other states. As a consequence, a significant number of professionally prepared and experienced educators is lost to our school systems. Facilitating the employment of qualified educational personnel, without reference to their states of origin, can increase the available educational resources. Participation in this compact can increase the availability of educational manpower.

ARTICLE II Definitions

As used in this agreement and contracts made pursuant to it, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Educational personnel” means persons who must meet requirements pursuant to state law as a condition of employment in educational programs.

“Designated state official” means the education official of a state selected by that state to negotiate and enter into, on behalf of his state, contracts pursuant to this agreement.

“Accept,” or any variant thereof, means to recognize and give effect to one or more determinations of another state relating to the qualifications of education personnel in lieu of making or requiring a like determination that would otherwise be required by or pursuant to the laws of a receiving state.

“State” means a state, territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

“Originating state” means a state (and the subdivision thereof, if any) whose determination that certain educational personnel are qualified to be employed for specific duties in schools is acceptable in accordance with the terms of a contract made pursuant to article III.

“Receiving state means a state (and the subdivisions thereof) which accept educational personnel in accordance with the terms of a contract made pursuant to article III.

ARTICLE III Interstate Educational Personnel Contracts

The designated state official of a party state may make one or more contracts on behalf of his state with one or more other party states providing for the acceptance of educational personnel. Any such con- tract for the period of its duration shall be applicable to and binding on the states who designated state officials enter into it, and the subdivisions of those states, with the same force and effect as if incorporated in this agreement. A designated state official may enter into a contract pursuant to this article only with states in which he finds that there are programs of education, certification standards or other acceptable qualifications that assure preparation or qualification of educational personnel on a basis sufficiently comparable, even though not identical to that prevailing in his own state.

Any such contract shall provide for:

Its duration.

The criteria to be applied by an originating state in qualifying educational personnel for acceptance by a receiving state.

Such waivers, substitutions, and conditional acceptances as shall aid the practical effectuation of the contract without sacrifice of basic educational standards.

Any other necessary matters.

No contract made pursuant to this agreement shall be for a term longer than five (5) years but any such contract may be renewed for like or lesser periods.

Any contract dealing with acceptance of educational personnel on the basis of their having completed an educational program shall specify the earliest date or dates on which originating state approval of the program or programs involved can have occurred. No contract made pursuant to this agreement shall require acceptance by a receiving state of any persons qualified because of successful completion of a program prior to January 1, 1954.

The certification or other acceptance of a person who has been accepted pursuant to the terms of a contract shall not be revoked or otherwise impaired because the contract has expired or been terminated. However, any certificate or other qualifying document may be revoked or suspended on any ground which would be sufficient for revocation or suspension of a certificate or other qualifying document initially granted or approved in the receiving state.

A contract committee composed of the designated state officials of the contracting states or their representatives shall keep the contract under continuous review, study means of improving its administration, and report no less frequently than once a year to the heads of the appropriate education agencies of the contracting states.

ARTICLE IV Approved and Accepted Programs

Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to repeal or other- wise modify any law or regulation or a party state relating to the approval of programs of educational preparation having effect solely on the qualification of educational personnel within that state.

To the extent that contracts made pursuant to this agreement deal with the educational requirements for the proper qualification of educational personnel, acceptance of a program of educational preparation shall be in accordance with such procedures and requirements as may be provided in the applicable contract.

ARTICLE V Interstate Cooperation

The party states agree that:

They will, so far as practicable, prefer the making of multilateral contracts pursuant to article III of this agreement.

They will facilitate and strengthen cooperation in interstate certification and other elements of educational personnel qualification and for this purpose shall cooperate with agencies, organizations, and associations interested in certification and other elements of educational personnel qualification.

ARTICLE VI Agreement Evaluation

The designated state officials of any party states may meet from time to time as a group to evaluate progress under the agreement, and to formulate recommendations for changes.

ARTICLE VII Other Arrangements

Nothing in this agreement shall be construed to prevent or inhibit other arrangements or practices of any party state or states to facilitate the interchange of educational personnel.

ARTICLE VIII Effect and Withdrawal

This agreement shall become effective when enacted into law by two (2) states. Thereafter it shall become effective as to any state upon its enactment of this agreement.

Any party state may withdraw from this agreement by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one (1) year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states.

No withdrawal shall relieve the withdrawing state of any obligation imposed upon it by a contract to which it is a party. The duration of contracts and the methods and conditions of withdrawal therefrom shall be specified in their terms.

ARTICLE IX Construction and Severability

This agreement shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this agreement shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this agreement is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this agreement and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this agreement shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the agreement shall remain in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

16-11-6.
Designated state official.

The “designated state official” for this state shall be the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The commissioner is hereby authorized to enter into contracts pursuant to article III of the agreement in §

16-11-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 206, § 2.

16-11-7.
Publication of contracts.

True copies of all contracts made on behalf of this state pursuant to the agreement shall be kept on file in the office of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education and in the office of the secretary of state. The department of elementary and secondary education shall publish all contracts in convenient form.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 206, § 3.

16-11-8.
Recruitment and selection of teachers — Troops to Teachers.

The Rhode Island department of education shall, as part of its certification of qualified candidates, utilize and apply for available grants with the Troops to Teachers (TTT) program whose oversight is provided by the United States Department of Defense and managed by the Defense Activity for Non-Traditional Educational Support (DANTES).

The implementation of the TTT program pursuant to this section shall be contingent upon federal funding. State funds or appropriations shall not be utilized in connection with the implementation of this section.

The commissioner shall promulgate whatever rules and regulations, including the creation of necessary forms and applications, that are required to carry out the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 135, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 287, § 1.

16-11-9.
Fast-track principal certification program.

The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) shall establish a fast-track principal certification program.

The fast-track principal certification program shall include, but need not be limited to, the following courses:

School finance;

School law; and

Program evaluation, including data analysis.

Participants will earn a principal certification after successful completion of the courses, from a program approved by the department, required in subsection (b) of this section, and successful completion of the following three (3) requirements:

A year-long internship shadowing a principal in the district where the participant is currently employed;

Leading a districtwide or schoolwide initiative; and

Successfully passing assessment requirements for Rhode Island principal certification.

To be eligible for admission into the fast-track principal certification program, an applicant shall:

Have a minimum of ten (10) years’ experience as a teacher rated “effective” or “highly effective”;

Have a recommendation from the superintendent(s) of the local education agency (LEA) or agencies in which the applicant worked as a teacher previously, or is working currently;

Have a record of consistent leadership within an LEA, demonstrated through serving as a facilitator of professional development, a dean, a district coach, a department chair, or in another leadership position within a school or LEA; and

Possess a master’s degree or higher.

Participants who earn a principal certification pursuant to this section shall complete a department-approved leadership development program to build leadership skills that support teaching and learning within the first renewal cycle of their certification.

For the purposes of this section, “local education agencies” shall include all of the following within the state:

Public school districts;

Regional school districts;

State-operated schools;

Regional collaborative schools; and

Charter schools.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 151, § 1.

16-11-10.
Streamlining English language learner certification.

The department of education shall provide rules and regulations to streamline the English as a second language (ESL) and/or English language learner (ELL) teaching certification, including, but not limited to: providing reciprocity to persons who hold a Massachusetts teaching certificate with similar certification in ELL and/or the Massachusetts counterpart, sheltered English immersion endorsements (SEI); providing cohorts where current Rhode Island certified teachers can obtain ESL and/or ELL endorsements; providing classes for current Rhode Island certified teachers at the individual school level within each school district, as well as accepting classes for Rhode Island ESL and/or ELL certification that are accepted for Massachusetts SEI endorsement.

The intention of this section is to increase the number and percentage of teachers in the state who are certified as English as a second language (ESL) and/or English language learner (ELL) teachers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 296, § 1, effective January 1, 2022; P.L. 2021, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2022.